California, session 20252026, SB709.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21715.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:21715.2. (a) A rental agreement shall disclose, in the manner described in subdivision (b), all of the following:(1) The initial length and renewal term of the rental agreement.(2) Whether the occupant has received a promotional or discounted rental fee.(3) If the occupant has received a promotional or discounted rental fee, the duration of the promotional or discounted rental fee.(4) Whether the rental fee is subject to change and, if so, the maximum rental fee that the owner could charge during the first 12 months following the date of the rental agreement.(5) All required steps for the occupant to terminate the rental agreement and avoid future rental fees or other charges, including removing all personal property from the occupant’s storage space.(6) Contact information for the owner.(b) (1) The disclosures required by paragraphs (1) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be made on the first page of the rental agreement.(2) The disclosures required by subdivision (a) shall be made in larger type than the surrounding text and in a manner that clearly calls attention to the language and meet either of the following criteria:(A) The disclosures are in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text.(B) The disclosures are set off from the surrounding text by symbols or by other marks.(c) This section shall apply only to a rental agreement initially entered into on or after January 1, 2026.